Montana, session 2025, SB123.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Coordination of stream, wetland, floodplain, and other water body
permitting, authorization, and certification. (1) During a state of emergency or disaster proclaimed pursuant
to the governor's authority as provided in 10-3-104 and subject to the division's duties as provided in 10-3-105,
the division shall coordinate local, state, and federal emergency activities related to the following permits,
permissions, or authorizations:
(a) a project requiring written consent of conservation supervisors for work in or near a perennial
stream pursuant to 75-7-112;
(b) a notice of construction or hydraulic projects in a streambed by an agency of state government,
a county, a municipality, or other subdivision of the state granted by the department of fish, wildlife, and parks
pursuant to 87-5-501;
(c) a permit or variance for a use or an obstruction in a flood plain or floodway granted by the
department of natural resources and conservation or a responsible political subdivision pursuant to Title 76,
chapter 5, part 4;
(d) a permit granted by the U.S. army corps of engineers for a structure in or construction affecting
a navigable waterway pursuant to the Rivers and Harbors Act of 1899, 33 U.S.C. 401, et seq.;
(e) a permit granted by the U.S. army corps of engineers for the discharge of dredged or fill
material into the waters of the United States pursuant to the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, 33 U.S.C.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 123

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 123.1
1251 through 1387;
(f) water quality certification by the department of environmental quality for federally permitted
activities that may result in a discharge to state waters under the authority provided in 75-5-401 and pursuant to
the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, 33 U.S.C. 1251 through 1387;
(g) an authorization by the department of environmental quality for a short-term water quality
standard for turbidity;
(h) a written authorization from the department of natural resources and conservation for the
historical use of the bed of a navigable river below the low-water mark pursuant to 77-1-1112; and
(i) a lease, license, or easement granted by the department of natural resources and conservation
for use of the bed of a navigable river up to the low-water mark pursuant to 77-1-1115.
(2) Coordination activities subject to division jurisdiction include requirements for:
(a) the physical presence of agency personnel at onsite meetings;
(b) the timely submission by agency personnel of required documents;
(c) the tracking of each permit, permission, or authorization in subsection (1) for communication to
the general public;
(d) the development of comparison benchmarks for each agency to measure and determine
progress on a permit, permission, or authorization;
(e) the sharing and use of engineering studies, site surveys, and other technical information to
prevent duplicative efforts by other agency personnel.
(3) The division may not compel a federal agency to take action.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Coordination during state of emergency or disaster. During a state of
emergency or disaster and pursuant to [section 1], the division of disaster and emergency services shall
coordinate activities related to permitting uses or obstacles within a flood plain or floodway.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Coordination during state of emergency or disaster. During a state of
emergency or disaster and pursuant to [section 1], the division of disaster and emergency services shall
coordinate department activities related to a lease, license, or easement granted for the use of the bed of a
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 123

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 123.1
navigable river up to the low-water mark.

Section 4. Section 75-5-318, MCA, is amended to read:
"75-5-318. Short-term water quality standards for turbidity. (1) Upon authorization by the
department or the department of fish, wildlife, and parks pursuant to subsection (4), the short-term water quality
standards for total suspended sediment and turbidity resulting from stream-related construction activities or
stream enhancement projects are the narrative standards for total suspended sediment adopted by the
department under 75-5-301. If a short-term narrative standard is authorized under this section, the numeric
standard for turbidity adopted by the department under 75-5-301 does not apply to the affected water body
during the term of the narrative standard.
(2) The department shall review each application for short-term standards on a case-by-case basis
to determine whether there are reasonable alternatives that preclude the need for a narrative standard. If the
department determines that the numeric standard for turbidity adopted under 75-5-301 cannot be achieved
during the term of the activity and that there are no reasonable alternatives to achieve the numeric standard,
the department may authorize the use of a narrative standard for a specified term.
(3) Each authorization issued by the department must include conditions that minimize, to the
extent practicable, the magnitude of any change in water quality and the length of time during which any
change may occur. The authorization must also include site-specific conditions that ensure that the activity is
not harmful, detrimental, or injurious to public health and the uses of state waters and that ensure that existing
and designated beneficial uses of state water are protected and maintained upon completion of the activity. The
department may not authorize short-term narrative standards for activities requiring a discharge permit under
rules adopted pursuant to 75-5-401. Authorizations issued under this section may include conditions that
require water quality or quantity monitoring and reporting.
(4) In the performance of its responsibilities under this section, the department may negotiate
operating agreements with other departments of state government that are intended to minimize duplication in
review of activities eligible for authorizations under this section. The department of fish, wildlife, and parks may,
in accordance with subsections (1), (2), and (3), authorize short-term water quality standards for total
suspended sediment and turbidity for any stream construction project that it reviews under Title 75, chapter 7,
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – SB 123

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 123.1
part 1, or Title 87, chapter 5, part 5.
(5) During a state of emergency or disaster, the department is subject to the coordination of
application activities by the division of disaster and emergency services pursuant to [section 1]."

Section 5. Section 75-5-402, MCA, is amended to read:
"75-5-402. Duties of department. The department shall:
(1) issue, suspend, revoke, modify, or deny permits to discharge sewage, industrial wastes, or
other wastes into state waters, consistently with rules made by the department;
(2) examine plans and other information needed to determine whether a permit should be issued
or suggest changes in plans as a condition to the issuance of a permit;
(3) clearly specify in any permit any limitations imposed as to the volume, strength, and other
significant characteristics of the waste to be discharged; and
(4) establish as conditions to the issuance of permits for which a performance bond or other surety
is filed under 75-5-405 certain reclamation requirements sufficient to prevent pollution of state waters during
and after operation of the project or activity for which a permit is issued; and
(5) submit to the coordination of permit activities by the division of disaster and emergency
services during a state of emergency or disaster pursuant to [section 1]."

Section 6. Section 75-7-113, MCA, is amended to read:
"75-7-113. Emergencies -- procedure. (1) The provisions of this part do not apply to those actions
that are necessary to safeguard life or property, including growing crops, during periods of emergency. The
person responsible for a taking action under this section shall notify the supervisors in writing within 15 days of
the action taken as a result of an emergency. During a state of emergency or disaster, the person and the
supervisors are subject to the coordination of activities by the division of disaster and emergency services
pursuant to [section 1].
(2) The emergency notice given under subsection (1) must contain the following information:
(a) the location of the action taken;
(b) a general description of the action taken;
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – SB 123

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 123.1
(c) the date on which the action was taken; and
(d) an explanation of the emergency causing the need for the action taken.
(3) If the supervisors determine that the action taken meets the definition of a project, the
supervisors shall send one copy of the notice, within 5 working days of its receipt, to the department.
(4) A team, called together as described in 75-7-112(2), shall make an onsite inspection within 20
days of receipt of the emergency notice.
(5) Each member of the team shall recommend in writing, within 30 days of the date of the
emergency notice, denial, approval, or modification of the project.
(6) The supervisors shall review the emergency project and affirm, overrule, or modify the
individual team recommendations and notify the applicant and team members of their decision within 60 days of
receipt of the emergency notice.
(7) A person who has undertaken an emergency action that is denied or modified shall submit
written notice, as provided in 75-7-111, to obtain approval pursuant to 75-7-112 to mitigate the damages to the
stream caused by the emergency action and to achieve a long-term solution, if feasible, to the emergency
situation. Notice under this subsection must be filed within 90 days after the supervisors' decision.
(8) (a) When a member of the team, other than an applicant, disagrees with the supervisors'
decision of an emergency action, the team member shall request that an arbitration panel, as provided for in
75-7-114, be appointed to hear the dispute and to make a final written decision on the dispute.
(b) When an applicant disagrees with the supervisors' decision, the applicant shall, within 30
working days of receipt of the supervisors' decision:
(i) agree to arbitration under this section and request that an arbitration panel, as provided for in
75-7-114, be appointed to hear the dispute and make a final written decision regarding the dispute; or
(ii) appeal the decision of the supervisors to the district court for the county where the project is
located.
(9) The failure of a person to perform the following subjects the person to civil and criminal
penalties under 75-7-123:
(a) failure to provide emergency notice under subsection (1);
(b) failure to submit a notice of the project under subsection (7); or
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – SB 123

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 123.1
(c) failure to implement the terms of a supervisors' decision for the purpose of mitigating the
damage to the stream caused by the emergency action and of achieving a permanent solution, if feasible, to
the emergency situation."

Section 7. Section 87-5-502, MCA, is amended to read:
"87-5-502. Notice of construction or hydraulic projects. An agency of state government, county,
municipality, or other subdivision of the state of Montana, hereafter from now on called applicant, shall may not
construct, modify, operate, maintain, or fail to maintain any a construction project or hydraulic project which
may or will obstruct, damage, diminish, destroy, change, modify, or vary that obstructs, damages, diminishes,
destroys, changes, modifies, or varies the natural existing shape and form of any a stream or its banks or
tributaries by any type or form of construction without first causing serving notice of such the planned
construction to be served upon on the department on forms furnished by the department as soon as preliminary
plans are completed but not less than 60 days prior to commencement of final plans for construction. Such The
notice shall must include detailed plans and specifications of so much of said the project as may or will affect
any such that affects a stream in any manner specified above. During a state of emergency or disaster, the
applicant is subject to coordination of activities by the division of disaster and emergency services pursuant to
[section 1]."

NEW SECTION. Section 8. Codification instruction. (1) [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 10, chapter 3, part 3, and the provisions of Title 10, chapter 3, part 3, apply to [section 1].
(2) [Section 2] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title 76, chapter 5, part 4, and the
provisions of Title 76, chapter 5, part 4, apply to [section 2].
(3) [Section 3] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title 77, chapter 1, part 11, and the
provisions of Title 77, chapter 1, part 11, apply to [section 3].
- END -
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – SB 123